District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.04

Inspection required after repair; alteration of condemnation tag prohibited.

No person shall use or, having the same under his control, permit to be used, any weight, scale, measure, weighing or measuring device, or any attachment or part thereof after the same has been altered or repaired without the same having been inspected and approved as provided in this subchapter after such alterations or repairs have been made, and no persons shall alter, obliterate, detach, obscure, or conceal any condemnation seal, stamp, mark, tag, or label, attached or impressed by the Director or any of his assistants or inspectors, without written permission of the Director.

History

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1218, ch. 118, § 4
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 10-105.
1973 Ed., § 10-104.

Editor's Notes

Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.